Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 24.1. Tanning Facilities.

§ 59.1-310.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:

“Fitzpatrick scale” means the following scale for classifying a skin type, based on the skin’s reaction to the first 10 to 45 minutes of sun exposure after the winter season:

Skin Type: Sunburning and Tanning History 1 Always burns easily; never tans 2 Always burns easily; tans minimally 3 Burns moderately; tans gradually 4 Burns minimally; always tans well 5 Rarely burns; tans profusely 6 Never burns; deeply pigmented

Click to view

“Owner” means a person who owns or operates a tanning facility.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or association.

“Phototherapy device” means a piece of equipment that emits ultraviolet radiation and that is used by a health care provider in the treatment of a disease.

“Tanning device” means any equipment that emits electromagnetic radiation with wavelengths in the air between 200 and 400 nanometers and that is used for tanning of human skin, including a sunlamp, tanning booth, or tanning bed. The term also includes
any accompanying equipment, including protective eyewear, timers, and handrails.

“Tanning facility” means a business that provides persons access to tanning devices.

History.
1990, c. 776; 2007, c. 575.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 575 added the definitions of “Fitzpatrick scale” and “Owner”; inserted “limited liability company” in the definition of “Person”; and substituted “provider” for “professional” in the definition of “Phototherapy device.”

§ 59.1-310.2.
Federal law compliance; application of chapter.

A tanning device utilized by a tanning facility shall comply with all applicable federal laws and regulations. This chapter shall not apply to a phototherapy device used by or under the supervision of a licensed physician trained in the use of phototherapy
devices.

History.
1990, c. 776.

§ 59.1-310.3.
Notice to customers; liability.

A tanning facility shall give each customer a written statement warning that:

Failure to use the eye protection provided to the customer by the tanning facility may result in damage to the eyes;

Overexposure to ultraviolet light causes burns;

Repeated exposure may result in premature aging of the skin and skin cancer;

Abnormal skin sensitivity or burning may be caused by reactions of ultraviolet light to certain (i) foods; (ii) cosmetics; or (iii) medications, including tranquilizers, diuretics, antibiotics, high blood pressure medicines, or birth control pills; and

Any person taking a prescription or over-the-counter drug should consult a physician prior to using a tanning device.

Prior to allowing a prospective customer to use a tanning device, the owner or his designee shall obtain on the written statement the signature of each customer on a duplicate of the written statement provided to the customer under subsection A.

Compliance with the notice requirements does not affect the liability of a tanning facility owner or a manufacturer of a tanning device.

The signed duplicates of the written statements provided under subsection A may be retained at a location other than the tanning facility if an electronic or facsimile image of the original is readily available at each of an owner’s tanning facilities.

History.
1990, c. 776; 2007, c. 575; 2020, c. 387.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 575 added subsections B and D; and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C and substituted “owner” for “operator” in subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 387 deleted the last sentence of subsection B, which read: “In addition, the owner or his designee shall obtain, every six months, the signature of the parent or legal guardian of a prospective customer who is under the age of
15 and is not emancipated under Virginia law.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 59.1-310.4.
Warning signs.

A tanning facility shall post a warning sign in a conspicuous location where it is readily readable by persons entering the establishment. The sign shall contain the following warning:

Click to view

DANGER: ULTRAVIOLET RADIATION Repeated exposure to ultraviolet radiation may cause chronic sun damage to the skin characterized by wrinkling, dryness, fragility, and bruising of the skin, and skin cancer. Failure to use protective eyewear may result in
severe burns or permanent injury to the eyes. Medications or cosmetics may increase your sensitivity to ultraviolet radiation. Consult a physician or nurse practitioner before using a sunlamp if you are using medications, have a history
of skin problems, or believe you are especially sensitive to sunlight. Pregnant women or women taking oral contraceptives who use this product may develop discolored skin. IF YOU DO NOT TAN IN THE SUN, YOU WILL NOT TAN FROM USE OF
AN ULTRAVIOLET SUNLAMP. B. A tanning facility shall post a warning sign, one sign for each tanning device, in a conspicuous location that is readily readable to a person about to use the device. The sign shall contain the following:
DANGER: ULTRAVIOLET RADIATION 1. Follow the manufacturer’s instructions for use of this device. 2. Avoid too frequent or lengthy exposure. As with natural sunlight, exposure can cause serious eye and skin injuries and allergic reactions.
Repeated exposure may cause skin cancer. 3. Wear protective eyewear. Failure to use protective eyewear may result in severe burns or permanent damage to the eyes. 4. Do not sunbathe before or after exposure to ultraviolet radiation
from sunlamps. 5. Medications or cosmetics may increase your sensitivity to ultraviolet radiation. Consult a physician or nurse practitioner before using a sunlamp if you are using medication, have a history of skin problems, or believe
you are especially sensitive to sunlight. Pregnant women or women using oral contraceptives who use this product may develop discolored skin. IF YOU DO NOT TAN IN THE SUN, YOU WILL NOT TAN FROM USE OF THIS DEVICE.

History.
1990, c. 776; 2004, c. 855.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations
took effect July 15, 2004.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing shall amend regulations governing the licensure of nurse practitioners to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act. Such amendments shall require inclusion
of the nurse practitioner’s authority for signatures, certifications, stamps, verifications, affidavits and endorsements in the written protocol between the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855 inserted “or nurse practitioner” in the next-to-last sentence of the next-to-last paragraph in subsection A; and inserted “or nurse practitioner” in the next-to-last sentence of subdivision B 5.

§ 59.1-310.5.
Operational requirements.

A tanning facility shall have an operator present during operating hours. The operator shall be sufficiently knowledgeable in the correct operation of the tanning devices used at the facility and shall inform and assist each customer in the proper use
of the tanning device.

The owner or his designee shall identify the skin type of the customer based on the Fitzpatrick scale, document the skin type of the customer, and advise the customer of the customer’s maximum time of recommended exposure in the tanning device.

Before each use of a tanning device, the operator shall provide the customer with properly sanitized protective eyewear that protects the eyes from ultraviolet radiation and allows adequate vision to maintain balance. The operator shall not allow a person
to use a tanning device if that person has not been provided protective eyewear. The operator shall also instruct each customer how to use suitable physical aids, such as handrails and markings on the floor, to maintain proper
exposure distance as recommended by the manufacturer of the tanning device.

After each use of a tanning device, the owner or his designee shall clean the device with a cleaner or sanitizer capable of killing bacteria from any previous use.

The tanning facility shall use a timer with an accuracy of at least plus or minus ten percent of any selected time interval. The facility shall limit the exposure time of a customer on a tanning device to the maximum exposure time recommended by the manufacturer.
The facility shall control the interior temperature of a tanning device so that it may not exceed 100 degrees Fahrenheit.

Either each time a customer uses a tanning facility or each time a person executes or renews a contract to use a tanning facility, the person shall sign a written statement acknowledging that the person has read and understood the required warnings before
using the device and agrees to use the protective eyewear that the tanning facility provides.

No individual under the age of 18 shall be allowed to use any tanning device, other than a spray tanning device that does not emit ultraviolet light, at a tanning facility. The owner shall be responsible for ensuring that each customer using the tanning
facility is of legal age to do so.

A tanning facility shall not claim, or distribute promotional material that claims that the use of a tanning device is safe, is without risk, or will result in medical or health benefits.

The provisions of subsection G shall not prohibit any person licensed by the Board of Medicine to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine from prescribing or using a phototherapy device for any patient, regardless of age. For the purposes of this section,
“phototherapy device” means a device that emits ultraviolet radiation and is used in the diagnosis or treatment of disease or injury.

History.
1990, c. 776; 2007, c. 575; 2020, c. 387.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 575 added subsections B, D, G and H; and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 387, in subsection G, added the first sentence; and added subsection I.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 59.1-310.6.
Violations of chapter; penalty.

Any person other than a customer, who knowingly and willfully violates any statute pertaining to the operation of tanning facilities shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.
1990, c. 776.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.